Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.76, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Rebasing of dental payment rates. new text end new text begin Beginning January 1, 2026, and every three years thereafter, the commissioner must rebase payment rates for dental services. The total aggregate expenditures for the initial rebasing must not exceed the total amount spent as calculated using the payment methods specified in subdivision 2, adjusted by the change in the Medical Economic Index (MEI) between midyear of 2024 and midyear of 2026. For each subsequent rebasing, the total aggregate expenditures must not exceed the total amount spent as calculated using the payment methods specified in subdivision 2, adjusted by the change in the MEI between the midpoint of the base year and the midpoint of the year for which rebasing is effective. The base year used for each rebasing must be the calendar year that is two years prior to the effective date of the rebasing. This section does not apply to federally qualified health centers, rural health centers, state-operated dental clinics, or Indian health centers. new text end